Montana, session 2025, SB501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 and 2] may be cited as the "Keep Montanans
Housed Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Right of first refusal -- timelines. (1) Before a landlord may sell a
rented dwelling unit or the premises on which a rented dwelling unit is located or issue a notice to vacate the
dwelling unit or premises for reasons of demolition, repurposing, or selling, the landlord shall give the tenant an
opportunity to purchase the dwelling unit or the premises on which the dwelling unit is located at a price and
with material terms that represent a bona fide offer of sale.
(2) A landlord shall provide the tenant a copy of the offer of sale by hand delivery, electronic
transmission, or certified mail. A landlord may not retain a percentage of ownership in the dwelling unit or the
premises on which the dwelling unit is located in the offer of sale.
(3) The sales price contained in the offer of sale may not be more than a price comparable to that
at which a willing seller and a willing buyer would sell and purchase the dwelling unit or the premises on which
the dwelling unit is located or the appraised value of the dwelling unit or premises.
(4) Upon receipt of the offer of sale from the owner:
(a) a tenant has 45 days to accept the offer of sale; and
(b) a tenant may challenge an offer of sale as not being a bona fide offer of sale and request a
determination of the appraised value by a licensed real estate appraiser as defined in 37-54-102 at the expense
of the tenant by providing written notice to the landlord by hand delivery, electronic transmission, or certified
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 501

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 501.1
mail.
(5) If a tenant that receives an offer of sale consistent with this section rejects the offer of sale or
fails to respond within the timelines pursuant to this section, the owner may immediately proceed with the sale
of the dwelling unit or the premises on which a dwelling unit is located to a third-party purchaser consistent with
the price and material terms of that offer of sale.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 and 2] are intended to be codified
as an integral part of Title 70, chapter 24, part 1, and the provisions of Title 70, chapter 24, part 1, apply to
[sections 1 and 2].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 501